Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202633-141
Legal notices; rates.

(1) Until one year after September 9, 1995, the legal rate for the publication of all legal notices other than those exceptional legal notices described in section 33-142 shall be forty-one cents per line, single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for the first insertion and thirty-five and nine-tenths cents per line, single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for each subsequent insertion. Publication of such notices may be in any type selected by the publisher. For the purpose of uniformity, the calculation of fees for such publication shall be based on the official conversion table that follows:

CONVERSION TABLEFive-and-One-Half-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions948.791 ¢ 42.721 ¢ 9 1/251.50245.0951054.21347.46910 1/256.92449.8431159.63552.21711 1/262.34654.5911265.05756.96512 1/267.76859.3391370.47961.71313 1/273.19064.0871475.90166.46114 1/278.61268.8351581.32371.20915 1/284.03473.5831686.74575.957

Six-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions944.725 ¢ 39.161 ¢ 9 1/247.21041.3371049.69543.51310 1/252.18045.6891154.66547.86511 1/257.15050.0411259.63552.21712 1/262.12054.3931364.60556.56913 1/267.09058.7451469.57560.92114 1/272.06063.0971574.54565.27315 1/277.03067.4491679.51569.625

Seven-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions938.339 ¢ 33.570 ¢ 9 1/240.46935.4351042.59937.30010 1/244.72939.1651146.85941.03011 1/248.98942.8951251.11944.76012 1/253.24946.6251355.37948.49013 1/257.50950.3551459.63952.22014 1/261.76954.0851563.89955.95015 1/266.02957.8151668.15959.680

Eight-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions933.544 ¢ 29.372 ¢ 9 1/235.40831.0041037.27232.63610 1/239.13634.2681141.00035.90011 1/242.86437.5321244.72839.16412 1/246.59240.7961348.45642.42813 1/250.32044.0601452.18445.69214 1/254.04847.3241555.91248.95615 1/257.77650.5881659.64052.220

Nine-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions929.817 ¢ 26.108 ¢ 9 1/231.47427.5591033.13129.01010 1/234.78830.4611136.44531.91211 1/238.10233.3631239.75934.81412 1/241.41636.2651343.07337.71613 1/244.73039.1671446.38740.61814 1/248.04442.0691549.70143.52015 1/251.35844.9711653.01546.422

Ten-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions926.836 ¢ 23.496 ¢ 9 1/228.32724.8021029.81826.10810 1/231.30927.4141132.80028.72011 1/234.29130.0261235.78231.33212 1/237.27332.6381338.76433.94413 1/240.25535.2501441.74636.55614 1/243.23737.8621544.72839.16815 1/246.21940.4741647.71041.780.

(2) Until October 1, 2022, the legal rate for the publication of all legal notices other than those exceptional legal notices described in section 33-142 shall be forty-five cents per line, single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for the first insertion and thirty-nine and four-tenths cents per line, single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for each subsequent insertion. Publication of such notices may be in any type selected by the publisher. For the purpose of uniformity, the calculation of fees for such publication shall be based on the official conversion table that follows:

CONVERSION TABLEFive-and-One-Half-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions953.553 ¢ 46.887 ¢ 9 1/256.52849.4921059.50352.09710 1/262.47854.7021165.45357.30711 1/268.42859.9121271.40362.51712 1/274.37865.1221377.35367.72713 1/280.32870.3321483.30372.93714 1/286.27875.5421589.25378.14715 1/292.22880.7521695.20383.357

Six-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions949.087 ¢ 42.980 ¢ 9 1/251.81545.3681054.54347.75610 1/257.27150.1441159.99952.53211 1/262.72754.9201265.45557.30812 1/268.18359.6961370.91162.08413 1/273.63964.4721476.36766.86014 1/279.09569.2481581.82371.63615 1/284.55174.0241687.27976.412

Seven-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions942.079 ¢ 36.842 ¢ 9 1/244.41738.8891046.75540.93610 1/249.09342.9831151.43145.03011 1/253.76947.0771256.10749.12412 1/258.44551.1711360.78353.21813 1/263.12155.2651465.45957.31214 1/267.79759.3591570.13561.40615 1/272.47363.4531674.81165.500

Eight-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions936.816 ¢ 32.236 ¢ 9 1/238.86234.0271040.90835.81810 1/242.95437.6091145.00039.40011 1/247.04641.1911249.09242.98212 1/251.13844.7731353.18446.56413 1/255.23048.3551457.27650.14614 1/259.32251.9371561.36853.72815 1/263.41455.5191665.46057.310

Nine-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions932.724 ¢ 28.655 ¢ 9 1/234.54330.2471036.36231.83910 1/238.18133.4311140.00035.02311 1/241.81936.6151243.63838.20712 1/245.45739.7991347.27641.39113 1/249.09542.9831450.91444.57514 1/252.73346.1671554.55247.75915 1/256.37149.3511658.19050.943

Ten-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions929.452 ¢ 25.788 ¢ 9 1/231.08927.2211032.72628.65410 1/234.36330.0871136.00031.52011 1/237.63732.9531239.27434.38612 1/240.91135.8191342.54837.25213 1/244.18538.6851445.82240.11814 1/247.45941.5511549.09642.98415 1/250.73344.4171652.37045.850.

(3) Beginning October 1, 2022, and until October 1, 2023, the legal rate for the publication of all legal notices other than those exceptional legal notices described in section 33-142 shall be forty-eight cents per line, single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for the first insertion and thirty-nine and four-tenths cents per line, single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for each subsequent insertion. Publication of such notices may be in any type selected by the publisher. For the purpose of uniformity, the calculation of fees for such publication shall be based on the official conversion table that follows:

CONVERSION TABLEFive-and-One-Half-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions957.102 ¢ 49.700 ¢ 9 1/260.29652.4621063.46955.22310 1/266.64357.9841169.81660.74511 1/272.98963.5071276.16366.26812 1/279.33669.0291382.50971.79113 1/285.68374.5521488.85677.31314 1/292.02980.0751595.20382.83615 1/298.37685.59716101.54988.358

Six-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions952.359 ¢ 45.559 ¢ 9 1/255.26948.0901058.17950.62110 1/261.08953.1531163.99955.68411 1/266.90858.2151269.81860.74612 1/272.72863.2781375.63865.80913 1/278.54868.3401481.45894.19214 1/284.36773.4031587.27775.93415 1/290.18778.4651693.09780.997

Seven-Point TypePica Width First InsertionSubsequent Insertions944.884 ¢ 39.053 ¢ 9 1/247.37841.2221049.87243.39210 1/252.36645.5621154.85947.73211 1/257.35349.9021259.84752.07112 1/262.34154.2411364.83556.41113 1/267.32958.5811469.81960.75114 1/272.31662.9211574.81065.09015 1/277.30467.2601679.79869.430

Eight-Point TypePica Width First InsertionSubsequent Insertions939.270 ¢ 34.170 ¢ 9 1/241.45336.0691043.63537.96710 1/245.81739.8661148.00041.76411 1/250.18243.6621252.36445.56112 1/254.54747.4591356.72949.35813 1/258.91251.2561461.09453.15514 1/263.27655.0531565.45956.95215 1/267.64158.8501669.82460.749

Nine-Point TypePica Width First InsertionSubsequent Insertions934.905 ¢ 30.374 ¢ 9 1/236.84632.0621038.78633.74910 1/240.72635.4371142.66637.12411 1/244.60738.8121246.54740.49912 1/248.48742.1871350.42743.87413 1/252.36845.5621454.30847.25014 1/256.24848.9371558.18850.62515 1/260.12952.3121662.06954.000

Ten-Point TypePica Width First InsertionSubsequent Insertions931.415 ¢ 27.335 ¢ 9 1/233.16128.8541034.90830.37310 1/236.65431.8921138.40033.41111 1/240.14634.9301241.89236.44912 1/243.63837.9681345.38439.48713 1/247.13041.0061448.87642.52514 1/250.62344.0441552.36945.56315 1/254.11547.0821655.86148.601.

(4) Beginning October 1, 2023, the legal rate for the publication of all legal notices other than those exceptional legal notices described in section 33-142 shall be fifty cents per line, single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for the first insertion and forty-three and thirty-four hundredths cents per line, single column, standard newspaper measurements of eight-point type and pica width of eleven for each subsequent insertion. Publication of such notices may be in any type selected by the publisher. For the purpose of uniformity, the calculation of fees for such publication shall be based on the official conversion table that follows:

CONVERSION TABLEFive-and-One-Half-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions959.481 ¢ 51.576 ¢ 9 1/262.80854.4411066.11457.30710 1/269.41960.1721172.72563.03811 1/276.03065.9031279.33668.76912 1/282.64171.6341385.94774.50013 1/289.55277.3651492.55880.23114 1/295.86383.0961599.16985.96215 1/2102.47588.82716105.78091.693

Six-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions954.541 ¢ 47.278 ¢ 9 1/257.57249.9051060.60352.53210 1/263.63455.1581166.66557.78511 1/269.69660.4121272.72763.03912 1/275.75865.6661378.78968.29213 1/281.82070.9191484.85197.74614 1/287.88276.1731590.91478.80015 1/293.94581.4261696.97684.053

Seven-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions946.754 ¢ 40.526 ¢ 9 1/249.35242.7781051.94945.03010 1/254.54747.2811157.14549.53311 1/259.74351.7851262.34054.03612 1/264.93856.2881367.53658.54013 1/270.13460.7921472.72863.04314 1/275.32965.2951577.92767.54715 1/280.52569.7981683.12372.050

Eight-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions940.906 ¢ 35.460 ¢ 9 1/243.18037.4301045.45339.40010 1/247.72641.3701150.00043.34011 1/252.27345.3101254.54647.28012 1/256.81949.2501359.09351.22013 1/261.36653.1911463.63955.16114 1/265.91357.1311568.18659.10115 1/270.45961.0711672.73363.041

Nine-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions936.360 ¢ 31.521 ¢ 9 1/238.38133.2721040.40235.02310 1/242.42336.7741144.44438.52511 1/246.46540.2771248.48642.02812 1/250.50743.7791352.52845.53013 1/254.54947.2811456.57149.03314 1/258.59250.7841560.61352.53515 1/262.63454.2861664.65556.037

Ten-Point TypePica WidthFirst InsertionSubsequent Insertions932.721 ¢ 28.367 ¢ 9 1/234.54029.9431036.35931.51910 1/238.17733.0961139.99634.67211 1/241.81536.2481243.63337.82512 1/245.45239.4011347.27140.97713 1/249.09042.5541450.90844.13014 1/252.72745.7061554.54647.28215 1/256.36448.8591658.18350.453.

R.S.1866, c. 19, § 17, p. 168;

Laws 1869, § 1, p. 159;

R.S.1913, § 2466;

Laws 1921, c. 181, § 1, p. 682;

C.S.1922, § 2407;

C.S.1929, § 33-146;

R.S.1943, § 33-141;

Laws 1951, c. 105, § 1, p. 511;

Laws 1965, c. 189, § 1, p. 580;

Laws 1971, LB 401, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 629, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 298, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 418, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB840, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB596, § 10.
July 18, 2026
This section prescribes a maximum rate for printing legal notices, and it is the rate to be charged in the absence of a specific agreement for a lower rate. Wisner v. Morrill County, 117 Neb. 324, 220 N.W. 280 (1928).

The first subdivision of this section, prior to its amendment in 1921, governed the computation of fees for publishing the notice of suit and list of lands necessary to an action under the scavenger law. Bee Publishing Co. v. Douglas County, 78 Neb. 244, 110 N.W. 624 (1907).

A printer is not required to charge the full legal rate prescribed by the statute, and if a printer charges less than the full legal rate for printing a notice of sale in a foreclosure action, that is the amount which the sheriff may charge as costs in the case. Phoenix Ins. Co. v. McEvony, 52 Neb. 566, 72 N.W. 956 (1897).